pl: Zgodne wyposażenie do treningu: Hamak do aerial jogi; Liny treningowe (battle ropes); Worek treningowy; Lina do wspinaczki; Kółka gimnastyczne; Lekkie akcesoria fitness; Taśmy do pilatesu; Taśmy oporowe; Taśmy do ćwiczeń w zawieszeniu (suspension trainer); Drabinka gimnastyczna; Huśtawka do jogi; Inne
sv: Kompatibla träningsutrustning: Aerial yoga-hängmatta; Battle ropes; Boxningssäck; Klätterrep; Romerska ringar; Lätta fitnesstillbehör; Pilatesremmar; Träningsband; Slingtränare; Ribbstol; Yoga-gunga; Övrigt
nl: Compatibele trainingsapparatuur: Aerial yogahangmat; Battle ropes; Bokszak; Klimtouw; Turnringen; Lichte fitnessaccessoires; Pilates-banden; Weerstandsbanden; Suspension trainer; Klimrek; Yoga swing; Overige
cs: Kompatibilní tréninkové vybavení: Houpací síť pro létající jógu; Posilovací lana; Boxovací pytel; Šplhací lano; Kruhy; Lehké fitness příslušenství; Popruhy na pilates; Posilovací gumy; Závěsný systém; Žebřiny; Houpačka na jógu; Jiné
ro-RO: Echipament de antrenament compatibil: Hamac pentru yoga aeriană; Frânghii de antrenament (battle ropes); Sac de box; Frânghie de cățărat; Inele de gimnastică; Accesorii ușoare de fitness; Benzi pentru Pilates; Benzi de rezistență; Sistem de antrenament în suspensie; Spalier; Leagăn pentru yoga; Altele
pt-BR: Equipamento de treinamento compatível: Rede de yoga aérea; Cordas navais; Saco de pancadas; Corda de escalada; Argolas de ginástica; Acessórios fitness leves; Alças de pilates; Faixas de resistência; Fita de treinamento suspenso; Espaldar; Balanço de yoga; Outro
hu: Kompatibilis edzőeszköz: Légjóga függőágy; Csatakötél; Boksz-zsák; Mászókötél; Tornagyűrű; Könnyű fitnesz kiegészítők; Pilates hevederek; Ellenállásos szalagok; Felfüggesztéses tréner; Bordásfal; Jógahinta; Egyéb
fr: Matériel d'entraînement compatible: Hamac de yoga aérien; Cordes ondulatoires; Sac de frappe; Corde à grimper; Anneaux de gymnastique; Petits accessoires de fitness; Sangles de Pilates; Bandes de résistance; Sangles de suspension; Espalier suédois; Balançoire de yoga; Autre
tr: Uyumlu antrenman ekipmanı: Hava yogası hamağı; Savaş halatları; Kum torbası; Tırmanma halatı; Jimnastik halkaları; Hafif fitness aksesuarları; Pilates kayışları; Direnç bantları; Süspansiyon antrenörü; İsveç merdiveni; Yoga salıncağı; Diğer
vi: Thiết bị tập luyện tương thích: Võng tập yoga võng; Dây thừng tập thể lực; Bao cát đấm bốc; Dây leo; Vòng treo thể dục; Phụ kiện tập thể hình nhẹ; Dây tập pilates; Dây kháng lực; Dây tập kháng lực toàn thân; Thang tập thể dục Thụy Điển; Võng tập yoga; Khác
sk-SK: Kompatibilné tréningové zariadenie: Sieť na aerial jogu; Bojové laná; Boxerské vrece; Šplhacie lano; Gymnastické kruhy; Ľahké fitness príslušenstvo; Popruhy na pilates; Odporové gumy; Závesný posilňovací systém; Rebriny; Hojdačka na jogu; Iné
de: Kompatible Trainingsgeräte: Aerial-Yoga-Tuch; Battle Ropes; Boxsack; Kletterseil; Turnringe; Leichtes Fitnesszubehör; Pilates-Schlaufen; Widerstandsbänder; Schlingentrainer; Sprossenwand; Yoga-Schaukel; Sonstige
sl-SI: Združljiva oprema za vadbo: Viseča mreža za zračno jogo; Bojne vrvi; Boksarska vreča; Plezalna vrv; Gimnastični krogi; Lahki fitnes pripomočki; Trakovi za pilates; Elastični trakovi za vadbo; Viseči trenažer; Letvenik; Gugalnica za jogo; Drugo
it: Attrezzatura di allenamento compatibile: Amaca per yoga aereo; Battle rope; Sacco da boxe; Corda da arrampicata; Anelli da ginnastica; Accessori fitness leggeri; Cinghie per pilates; Fasce di resistenza; Sistema di allenamento in sospensione; Spalliera svedese; Altalena da yoga; Altro
th: อุปกรณ์ฝึกซ้อมที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: เปลโยคะฟลาย; เชือกสะบัด; กระสอบทราย; เชือกปีน; ห่วงยิมนาสติก; อุปกรณ์ฟิตเนสน้ำหนักเบา; สายรัดพิลาทิส; ยางยืดออกกำลังกาย; อุปกรณ์แขวนออกกำลังกาย; บาร์ผนัง; ชิงช้าโยคะ; อื่นๆ
ja: 対応トレーニング機器: エアリアルヨガハンモック; バトルロープ; サンドバッグ; クライミングロープ; 体操吊り輪; 軽量フィットネスアクセサリー; ピラティスストラップ; レジスタンスバンド; サスペンショントレーナー; スウェディッシュラダー; ヨガスイング; その他
ru: Совместимое тренировочное оборудование: Гамак для аэройоги; Боевые канаты; Боксерский мешок; Канат для лазания; Гимнастические кольца; Легкие фитнес-аксессуары; Ремни для пилатеса; Эспандеры; Подвесной тренажер; Шведская стенка; Качели для йоги; Другое
zh-TW: 相容訓練設備: 空中瑜珈吊床; 戰繩; 拳擊沙包; 攀岩繩; 體操吊環; 輕型健身配件; 皮拉提斯拉力帶; 阻力帶; 懸吊訓練器; 肋木架; 瑜珈鞦韆; 其他
fi: Yhteensopivat kuntoilulaitteet: Ilmajoogariippumatto; Kuntoköydet; Nyrkkeilysäkki; Kiipeilyköysi; Voimistelurenkaat; Kevyet kuntoilutarvikkeet; Pilates-hihnat; Vastuskuminauhat; Harjoitushihnat; Puolapuut; Joogakeinu; Muu
el: Συμβατός εξοπλισμός εκπαίδευσης: Αιώρα εναέριας γιόγκα; Σχοινιά μάχης (battle ropes); Σάκος του μποξ; Σχοινί αναρρίχησης; Κρίκοι γυμναστικής; Ελαφριά αξεσουάρ γυμναστικής; Ιμάντες πιλάτες; Λάστιχα αντίστασης; Ιμάντες αιώρησης; Πολύζυγο; Κούνια γιόγκα; Άλλο
da: Kompatibelt træningsudstyr: Aerial yoga-hængekøje; Battle ropes; Boksesæk; Klatrereb; Gymnastikringe; Let fitnesstilbehør; Pilates-stropper; Træningselastikker; Slyngetræner; Ribbe; Yoga-gynge; Andet
bg-BG: Съвместимо тренировъчно оборудване: Хамак за въздушна йога; Бойни въжета; Боксов чувал; Въже за катерене; Гимнастически халки; Леки фитнес аксесоари; Ремъци за пилатес; Ластици за тренировка; Тренировъчни ремъци; Шведска стена; Люлка за йога; Друго
zh-CN: 适用训练设备: 空中瑜伽吊床; 战绳; 沙袋; 攀爬绳; 吊环; 轻型健身配件; 普拉提带; 阻力带; 悬吊训练器; 瑞典肋木; 瑜伽秋千; 其他
lt-LT: Suderinama treniruočių įranga: Oro jogos hamakas; Kovos virvės; Bokso maišas; Kopimo virvė; Gimnastikos žiedai; Lengvi fitneso priedai; Pilačių diržai; Pasipriešinimo gumos; Pakabos treniruoklis; Gimnastikos sienelė; Jogos sūpuoklės; Kita
nb: Kompatibelt treningsutstyr: Aerial yoga-hengekøye; Slengtau (battle ropes); Boksesekk; Klatretau; Turnringer; Lett treningstilbehør; Pilatesstropper; Treningsstrikker; Slyngetrener; Ribbevegg; Yoga-huske; Annet
pt-PT: Equipamento de treino compatível: Rede de ioga aéreo; Cordas de batalha; Saco de boxe; Corda de escalada; Argolas de ginástica; Acessórios de fitness leves; Fitas de pilates; Bandas de resistência; Treinador de suspensão; Espaldar; Baloiço de ioga; Outro
en: Compatible training equipment: Aerial yoga hammock; Battle ropes; Boxing bag; Climbing rope; Gym rings; Light fitness accessories; Pilates straps; Resistance bands; Suspension trainer; Swedish ladder; Yoga swing; Other
es: Equipo de entrenamiento compatible: Hamaca para yoga aéreo; Cuerdas de batalla; Saco de boxeo; Cuerda para escalar; Anillas de gimnasia; Accesorios de fitness ligeros; Correas de pilates; Bandas de resistencia; Entrenador en suspensión; Espaldera sueca; Columpio de yoga; Otro
hr-HR: Kompatibilna oprema za vježbanje: Viseća mreža za aerial jogu; Borbeno uže; Vreća za boks; Uže za penjanje; Gimnastičke karike; Laki rekviziti za fitness; Trake za pilates; Elastične trake; Suspenzijski trenažer; Švedske ljestve; Ljuljačka za jogu; Ostalo
ko: 호환 훈련 장비: 에어리얼 요가 해먹; 배틀 로프; 복싱 백; 클라이밍 로프; 짐 링; 경량 피트니스 액세서리; 필라테스 스트랩; 저항 밴드; 서스펜션 트레이너; 스웨디시 래더; 요가 스윙; 기타